Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Sections 2 to 5 of this  2025 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 458.480
to 458.490.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in sections 2 to 5 of this 2025 Act, “factory-produced  housing”
means housing that  is produced through off-site construction of the housing or housing
components, and that includes manufactured dwellings,  as defined in ORS 446.003, prefabri-
cated structures, as defined in ORS 197A.015,  or other types of housing developed through
volumetric modular, panelized modular or other modular components.
(2) The Housing and  Community Services Department shall use moneys available in the
Local Innovation and Fast Track Housing Program Fund to  provide funding to acquire or
construct factory-produced housing for low income households  consistent with the require-
ments of ORS 458.480 to 458.490.
(3) The department may provide funding for  up to five separate recipients or locations
under this section.
(4) In awarding funding under this section, in  addition to applying criteria adopted under
ORS 458.485 (4)(a), the department may give preference to funding housing that:
(a) Uses Oregon-based developers;
(b) Is geographically diverse, including coastal and eastern Oregon communities,  or is
sited in more than one location; or
(c) Uses materials that:
(A) Are nontraditional, including mass timber;
(B) Provide energy efficiency, carbon capture or other environmental benefits;
(C) Are produced in Oregon; or
(D) Are raw materials sourced from Oregon.
(5) In developing application criteria or evaluating  applications for funding provided un-
der this section, the department  shall consult with the advisory committee under section 4
(2)(a) of this 2025 Act  and not the Oregon Housing Stability Council, notwithstanding ORS
458.485 (1).
(6) Recipients of funding under this section must  cooperate with the department and the
contractor described in section 4  of this 2025 Act in preparing the report required under
section 5 of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 3145 (HB 3145-B) Page 1
SECTION 3. (1) In addition to the uses allowed under ORS 458.490 (3), moneys  in the
Local Innovation  and Fast Track Housing Program Fund are continuously appropriated to
the Housing and Community Services Department to take actions under section 2 of this 2025
Act.
(2) To  the extent that moneys are available in the fund and are not otherwise obligated
and that  eligible applications to provide housing are available for funding, it is intended that,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, the amount of $25,000,000 from the fund be  used for
purposes described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 4. (1) The Housing and Community Services  Department shall contract with
the Network for Oregon Affordable Housing (NOAH) to provide the services described in this
section.
(2) The contractor under this section shall:
(a) Convene a public-private advisory committee to offer input and guidance on project
solicitation processes and criteria as outlined in section 2 (5)  of this 2025 Act. The committee
must include representation from the Department  of Land Conservation and Development,
the building codes division of the Department of Consumer and Business Services, the
Oregon Housing Stability Council and local governments and from private firms and  individ-
uals with subject matter expertise related to housing development and  finance and modular
and manufactured housing production and installation.
(b) With guidance from the  advisory committee, provide the Housing and Community
Services Department with  recommendations for criteria for selecting projects to receive
funding and for evaluating  the feasibility and appropriateness of proposals under section 2
(5) of this 2025 Act.
(c) With input and direction from the advisory committee, arrange for  the provision of
technical assistance to recipients of funding under section 2 of this  2025 Act as may be
needed for the successful implementation of the proposal for  developing factory-produced
housing, including assistance in the form of navigating regulatory frameworks, accessing
interim and long-term financial resources,  procuring Oregon-sourced sustainable materials,
establishing technical specifications needed  for on-site delivery and installation and estab-
lishing systems of compliance related to the use of Local Innovation and Fast  Track Housing
Program Fund moneys.
(d) Provide systems for the transfer of knowledge necessary to set the industry up for
success beyond the housing developed through the use of moneys under  section 2 of this 2025
Act.
(e) Support industry and consumer awareness by showcasing  factory-produced housing
in multiple Oregon communities and building a constituency for innovative  housing methods
and materials.
(f) Identify  potential sources of ongoing funding to continue the activities under this
subsection.
(3) The contractor shall create the portions of the report required under section 5 (2) to
(4) of this 2025 Act.
(4) All agencies  of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist the
department and, at the request of the Director of the Housing and  Community Services De-
partment, the contractor in the  performance of the duties of the department and contractor
required by sections 2 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 5.
On or before September 15, 2027, the Housing and Community  Services De-
partment shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related to housing on:
(1) The results and findings of  moneys spent under section 2 of this 2025 Act, including
information regarding the recipients’ direct construction costs and total development costs;
Enrolled House Bill 3145 (HB 3145-B) Page 2
(2) The results  and findings of the efforts by the recipients of funds under section 2 of
this 2025 Act related to barriers overcome, barriers identified and ability  to secure additional
private debt or equity partnerships;
(3) The activities of the contractor under section 4 of this 2025 Act; and
(4) Recommendations for legislation  or funding to support factory-produced housing
within this state.
SECTION 6.
Sections 2 to 5 of this 2025 Act are repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 7. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community Services Department,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $650,000 to implement sections 4 and 5 of this
2025 Act.
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3145 (HB 3145-B) Page 3